District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.23

Eligibility for license renewal.

Applicants licensed under the waiver provisions of this subchapter shall be eligible for license renewal on the same terms as all other licensed respiratory care practitioners.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 722
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-203, § 2(h), 41 DCR 7707
1981 Ed., § 2-3307.23.